Massachusetts, session 194th, H1798.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:- 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no individual convicted or charged 
with a violent felony or a sexual offense pursuant to chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, while receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible to continue to 
receive such benefits absent a written waiver issued by the director of the Massachusetts 
emergency assistance program.